District of Columbia statutes.
48-315

Applicability.

(a)

Sections 48-311, 48-312, and 48-313 shall apply as of March 10, 2015.

(b)

Section 48-314 shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

History

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-191, § 6, 61 DCR 12160

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 8 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-164, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13734).